Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2080.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5463XS (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 2080 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 279.89 Area education agency 1 employees ââ access to student records. 2 1. The board of directors of each school district shall 3 allow an employee of an area education agency who provides 4 educational services and programs to students enrolled in the 5 school district to access any school district records related 6 to such students to the extent necessary for the employee to 7 maximize the effectiveness of the educational services and 8 programs provided by the employee to such students. 9 2. If there is a dispute between the board of directors 10 of a school district and an employee of an area education 11 agency related to whether the board of directors of the school 12 district should allow the employee to access a school district 13 record pursuant to subsection 1, the board of directors of the 14 school district shall allow the employee to access the record 15 if any of the following individuals so direct the board of 16 directors of the school district: 17 a. The director of special education of the area education 18 agency. 19 b. The special education director of the school district. 20